Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Public Use Areas.

Administrative Code. —

For public use, see 11 AAC 12.

Sec. 41.23.010.
Purpose of AS 41.23.010 — 41.23.040.

The purpose of AS

41.23.010

—

41.23.040

is to establish the area described in AS

41.23.040

as the Nelchina Public Use Area.
The Nelchina Public Use Area is established to

protect and maintain fish and wildlife habitat, particularly caribou calving areas, trumpeter swan nesting areas, and other important habitats for moose, Dall sheep, and brown bear so that traditional public uses of fish and wildlife populations may continue;

perpetuate and enhance public enjoyment of fish and wildlife and their habitat including fishing, hunting, trapping, viewing, and photography;

perpetuate and enhance general public recreation in a quality environment;

perpetuate and enhance additional public uses described in the Susitna Area Plan;

allow additional public uses of the area in a manner compatible with the purposes specified in (1) — (4) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1985)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 48, SLA 1985 provides: “Nothing in AS

41.23.010

—

41.23.040

as enacted in § 1 of this Act may be construed to restrict the development and establishment of the Susitna Hydroelectric Project.”

Sec. 41.23.020.
Management.

Management of the surface and subsurface estate of the Nelchina Public Use Area is the responsibility of the department. After adequate public hearings the commissioner may designate incompatible uses and shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Nelchina Public Use Area. With regard to the management of land within the central caribou calving area described in AS

41.23.040(b)

, the commissioner shall obtain the concurrence of the Department of Fish and Game in the adoption and revision of the management plan. With regard to the management of land within the public use area described in AS

41.23.040(c)

, the commissioner shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game in the adoption and revision of the management plan.

The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the management of fish and game resources and public use of fish and wildlife in the Nelchina Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.010

.

The Nelchina Public Use Area shall be open to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

, and the commissioner may adopt regulations to achieve the purposes specified in AS

41.23.010

. Each valid existing right or permit shall remain valid and continue in full force and effect according to its terms. Exploration, development, and extraction of subsurface resources shall be allowed in a manner that is compatible with the purposes specified in AS

41.23.010

(1) — (4).

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within or abutting state-owned land described in AS

41.23.040

but may acquire privately owned land by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Nelchina Public Use Area.

The commissioner may not manage the Nelchina Public Use Area as a unit of the state park system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1985)

Sec. 41.23.030.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict incompatible uses under the management plan adopted under AS

41.23.020

within the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.23.040

.

Nothing in AS

41.23.010

—

41.23.040

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and wildlife habitat within an area described in AS

41.23.040

.

The commissioner may not restrict lawful sport and subsistence fishing, hunting, or trapping rights allowed under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Nelchina Public Use Area.

The commissioner shall allow traditional access to the Nelchina Public Use Area by motorized or nonmotorized means of transportation to private land, interests in private land, and for lawful sport and subsistence hunting, fishing, trapping, and recreational purposes in a manner that is compatible with purposes specified in AS

41.23.010

(1) — (4).

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Fish and Game shall have necessary access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Nelchina Public Use Area, the commissioner shall state in the management plan adopted or revised under AS

41.23.020

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for each determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1985)

Sec. 41.23.040.
Nelchina Public Use Area.

The vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within the boundaries described in this section are designated as the Nelchina Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for control and management.

The land described in this subsection is the central caribou calving area:

Township 5 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 6 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 7 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 8 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 9 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 10 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian, those portions of Sections 2 — 4 and 11 lying south of the Tyone River and

Township 23 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 24 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 24 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 25 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 25 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 26 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 27 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 28 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 29 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

That portion of Township 29 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

Township 29 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 30 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 30 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 30 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

That portion of Township 30 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian, lying southeast of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 30 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 30 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 30 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna and Tyone Rivers;

Township 31 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

That portion of Township 31 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 31 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

Township 31 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian, that portion of section 31 lying southeast of the Susitna River.

The land described within this subsection is the area of the Nelchina Public Use Area that is outside of the central caribou calving area:

Township 21 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 21 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 21 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 21 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 21 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 22 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 22 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 23 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 23 North, Range 8 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 9 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 10 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 11 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 23 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 24 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 24 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 24 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 25 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 25 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 26 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 26 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 27 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 27 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 28 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 28 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 29 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 29 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 29 North, Range 12 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 30 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 30 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 30 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 30 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian,

Township 30 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian,

That portion of Township 31 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 31 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

Township 31 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 31 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 31 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian, those portions of Sections 2 — 4 and Sections 11 — 12 lying south of the Susitna River, and

That portion of Township 32 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 32 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 32 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

That portion of Township 32 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian, lying south of the Susitna River;

Township 3 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 3 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 3 North, Range 11 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 4 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian, all sections except for portions of sections 20 and 29 described as John Lake Subdivision (ASLS-82-190);

Township 4 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 4 North, Range 11 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 5 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 5 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 6 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 6 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 7 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 7 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

Township 8 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian;

Township 8 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

That portion of Township 9 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian, lying southwest of the Tyone River;

Township 9 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian,

That portion of Township 10 North, Range 9 West, Copper River Meridian, lying southwest of the Tyone River;

Township 10 North, Range 10 West, Copper River Meridian, that portion of Sections 12 and 13 south of the Tyone River, and

Section 5

Section 8

Section 17;

Sections 4
—
5

Sections 8
—
9

Sections 16
—
17

Sections 20
—
21

Sections 28
—
29

Sections 32
—
33;

Sections 4
—
5

Sections 8
—
9

Sections 16
— 17

Sections 20
—
21

Sections 28
—
29

Sections 32
—
33;

Sections 4
—
5

Sections 8
—
9

Sections 16
—
17

Sections 20
—
21

Sections 28 — 29

Sections 32
—
33;

Sections 20
—
22

Sections 27
—
29

Sections 32
—
34;

Sections 9
—
10

Sections 14
—
16;

Sections 1
—
6

Sections 8
—
12;

Sections 1
—
14;

Sections 3
—
9

Sections 17
—
20;

Sections 1
—
4;

Section 6;

Section 1

Sections 12
—
13

Sections 24
—
25;

Sections 1
—
23

Sections 26
—
31;

Sections 1
—
2

Sections 11
—
13

Sections 24
—
25

Section 36;

Sections 1
—
17

Sections 20
—
28

Sections 35
—
36;

Sections 1
—
3

Sections 11
—
13;

Sections 1
—
6

Sections 8
—
17

Sections 21
—
28

Sections 33
—
36;

Section 13

Sections 23
—
26

Section 36;

Sections 3
—
9

Sections 16
—
21

Sections 28
—
34;

Sections 13
—
14

Sections 20
—
29

Sections 32
—
36;

Sections 1
—
3

Sections 8
—
36;

Sections 13
—
14

Sections 22
—
27

Sections 34
—
36;

Section 1

Sections 3, W1/2

Sections 4
—
9

Sections 11, E1/2

Sections 12
—
13

Sections 14, E1/2

Sections 16
—
20

Sections 23, E1/2

Sections 24
—
27

Section 30;

Sections 1
—
26

Sections 29
—
30

Sections 33, S1/2

Sections 34, S1/2

Sections 35
—
36;

Sections 1
—
22

Sections 24
—
25

Sections 27
—
34

Section 36;

Sections 1
—
24

Sections 27
—
34;

Section 7

Sections 13
—
36;

Sections 15
—
36;

Sections 1
—
2

Sections 10
—
16

Sections 21
— 36;

Sections 5
—
36;

Sections 1
—
5

Sections 7
—
36;

Sections 2
—
11

Sections 14
—
23

Sections 26
— 36;

Sections 24
—
25;

Sections 32
—
36;

Sections 3
—
10

Sections 14
—
23

Sections 26
—
35;

Sections 18
—
19

Sections 29
—
34;

Sections 4
—
10

Sections 14
—
36;

Section 7

Sections 18
—
20

Sections 29
—
32;

Sections 1
—
12

Sections 14
—
22

Sections 27
—
35;

Sections 1
—
2

Sections 10
—
15

Sections 22
—
27

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 1
—
12

Sections 15
—
19

Sections 30
—
31;

Sections 4
—
7;

Sections 5
—
10

Sections 15
—
21

Sections 28
—
33;

Sections 1
—
30

Sections 33
—
34;

Sections 1
—
4

Sections 9
—
16

Sections 19
— 36;

Sections 1
—
3

Sections 10
—
15

Sections 22
—
27

Sections 34
—
36;

Sections 1
—
3

Sections 10
—
15

Sections 22
—
27

Sections 34
—
36;

Sections 1
—
3

Sections 10
—
15

Sections 22
—
27

Sections 34
—
36;

Sections 1
—
4

Sections 9
—
16

Sections 23
—
26

Sections 35
—
36;

Sections 21
—
28

Sections 33
—
36.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1985)

Sec. 41.23.050.
Purpose of AS 41.23.050 — 41.23.080.

The purpose of AS

41.23.050

—

41.23.080

is to establish the area described in AS

41.23.080

as the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area. The Ernie Haugen Public Use Area is established to

protect and maintain fish and wildlife habitat so that traditional public uses may continue;

perpetuate and enhance public enjoyment of fishing, hunting, trapping, viewing, and photography;

perpetuate and enhance general public recreation in a quality environment; and

allow additional public uses of the area, including personal use wood cutting, when determined compatible with the purposes specified in (1) — (3) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.150

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.060.
Management.

Management of the surface and subsurface estate of the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area is the responsibility of the department. After adequate public hearings the commissioner may designate incompatible uses and shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area. With regard to the management of land within the public use area described in AS

41.23.080(a)

, the commissioner shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game in the adoption and revision of the management plan.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within or abutting state-owned land described in AS

41.23.080

but may acquire privately owned land by purchase, exchange, donation, or otherwise for inclusion in the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area.

The commissioner may not manage the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area as a unit of the state park system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.160

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.070.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict incompatible uses under the management plan adopted under AS

41.23.060

within the state-owned land described in AS

41.23.080

.

The commissioner shall allow traditional access to or through the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area by motorized or nonmotorized means of transportation to private land, interests in private land, and for lawful sport and subsistence hunting, fishing, trapping, and recreational purposes in a manner that is compatible with purposes specified in AS

41.23.050

(1) — (3).

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area, the commissioner shall state in the management plan adopted or revised under AS

41.23.060

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for each determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.170

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.080.
Ernie Haugen Public Use Area.

The state-owned land above the mean low water line and land above the mean low water line acquired by the state in the future lying within the parcels described in this subsection are designated as the Ernie Haugen Public Use Area:

Subject to valid existing rights, the land described in (a) of this section is designated as a special purpose area under art. VIII, sec. 7, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

Subject to a finding of public need by the Department of Natural Resources, the development of transportation facilities including roads, expansion of the existing boat launching ramp and related parking, highways, and ferry terminals by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities and electric power transmission facilities and other public utilities within the land described in (a) of this section is consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.050

—

41.23.080

.

Township 61 South, Range 82 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 28: that portion in the W1/2W1/2, SW1/4SE1/4NW1/4, W1/2E1/2SW1/4 that is south of the right-of-way of the Mitkof Highway

Section 29: that portion south of the right-of-way of the Mitkof Highway

Section 30: that portion south of the right-of-way of the Mitkof Highway

Section 31: that portion south of the right-of-way of the Mitkof Highway

Section 32: N1/2NW1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 110 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

41.23.180

.
Renumbered in 1988.

Sec. 41.23.100.
Purpose of AS 41.23.100 — 41.23.130.

The purpose of AS

41.23.100

—

41.23.130

is to establish the area described in AS

41.23.130

as the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.

The Hatcher Pass Public Use Area is established to

provide for public recreation activities;

protect and enhance the fishery, waterfowl, and wildlife resources and habitat and provide for public use of the fishery and wildlife resources, including fishing, grazing, hunting, and trapping;

protect the water quality and scenic resources within the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1986)

Sec. 41.23.110.
Management.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the surface and subsurface estate within the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.100

.

The commissioner of fish and game, the Board of Fisheries, and the Board of Game are responsible for the management of fish and game resources and public use of fish and wildlife in the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.100

.

After adequate public hearings and in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, the commissioner shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area in consultation with local governments and other affected state agencies. The management plan adopted under this section must be consistent with the purposes stated in AS

41.23.100

. A management plan adopted or revised by the commissioner under this section shall be submitted to the legislature within the first 10 days of the first regular session of the legislature to convene after its adoption or revision by the commissioner.

The provisions of AS

41.23.100

—

41.23.130

do not restrict a responsibility within the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area of the commissioner of fish and game, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, the commissioner of environmental conservation, or the commissioner of public safety.

The Hatcher Pass Public Use Area is closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

from September 1, 1986.

Each valid existing mining claim on September 1, 1986 remains valid and shall continue in full force and effect according to its terms.

Except for road construction, the state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within or abutting state-owned land described in AS

41.23.130

but may acquire privately owned land by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area from willing landowners.

Except for valid existing rights on September 1, 1986, the commissioner may not sell state land within the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For Hatcher Pass East management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 15.

Sec. 41.23.120.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict incompatible uses under the management plan adopted under AS

41.23.110

within the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.23.130

.

Nothing in AS

41.23.100

—

41.23.130

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and wildlife habitat within an area described in AS

41.23.130

that is consistent with the purposes stated in AS

41.23.100

.

The commissioner may not restrict lawful fishing, hunting, or trapping rights allowed under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.

The commissioner shall designate routes for motorized and nonmotorized access within or across the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.

The commissioner of public safety and the commissioner of fish and game shall have necessary access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area, the commissioner shall state in the management plan adopted or revised under AS

41.23.110

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for each determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For Hatcher Pass East management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 15.

Sec. 41.23.130.
Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.

The vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within the boundaries described in this section are designated as the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for control and management:

Township 19 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 1:
NW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4NE1/4NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4NW1/4

Section 2:
NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4NE1/4NW1/4, SE1/4SW1/4NW1/4, SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4SE1/4, W1/2NE1/4SE1/4, NE1/4NE1/4SE1/4

Section 10:
E1/2E1/2

Section 11:
W1/2, NW1/4NE1/4

Section 14:
W1/2

Section 15:
E1/2E1/2

Section 22:
E1/2E1/2

Section 23:
W1/2

Section 26:
W1/2SW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4

Section 27:
E1/2E1/2

Township 20 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 25:
S1/2S1/2SE1/4

Section 35:
SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4NE1/4

Section 36:
NE1/4, SW1/4, E1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, NW1/4NE1/4SE1/4, NW1/4SW1/4SE1/4

Township 20 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Section 9:
E1/2SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4NE1/4

Section 10:
W1/2SW1/4, E1/2NW1/4, SW1/4NW1/4, E1/2NW1/4NW1/4, W1/2NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4SW1/4NE1/4

Section 15:
W1/2W1/2NW1/4

Section 16:
SE1/4, E1/2NE1/4, E1/2W1/2NE1/4

Section 21:
E1/2SW1/4, E1/2SW1/4SW1/4, SW1/4SW1/4SW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, W1/2SW1/4SE1/4, NE1/4SW1/4SE1/4, W1/2NE1/4, W1/2NE1/4NE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, E1/2NE1/4NW1/4, SW1/4NE1/4NW1/4

Section 28:
NW1/4, W1/2NW1/4NE1/4, NW1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4SW1/4, NW1/4NE1/4SW1/4

Section 29:
E1/2SE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4SE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SW1/4, S1/2NE1/4SW1/4

Section 30:
S1/2S1/2S1/2, S1/2SE1/4

Section 31:
NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4, N1/2S1/2NE1/4

Section 32:
N1/2NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4NW1/4, NW1/4NW1/4NE1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For Hatcher Pass East management Area, see 11 AAC 20, art. 15.

Sec. 41.23.140.
Purpose of AS 41.23.140 — 41.23.170.

The purpose of AS

41.23.140

—

41.23.170

is to protect, maintain, enhance, and perpetuate the present use of the area described in AS

41.23.170

as the Goldstream Public Use Area. The Goldstream Public Use Area is established to

protect, maintain, perpetuate, and enhance year-round general public recreation;

protect, maintain, perpetuate, and enhance public enjoyment and use of fish and wildlife;

allow additional public uses of the area in a manner compatible with the purposes specified in (1) — (2) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 48, SLA 1990, provided that this section and AS

41.23.150

,

41.23.160

, and

41.23.170

would be repealed effective July 1, 2010.
Under § 1, ch. 25, SLA 2010, § 2, ch. 48, SLA 1990, was itself repealed, but the effective date of the repeal of § 2, ch. 48, SLA 1990, was August 25, 2010.
The legal effect of ch. 25, SLA 2010, is uncertain.
See AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Sec. 41.23.150.
Management.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the surface and subsurface estate of the Goldstream Public Use Area. After adequate public hearings, the commissioner shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Goldstream Public Use Area. The commissioner shall provide a copy of the management plan and each revision to the chairs of the resource committees of the legislature within 30 days of its adoption or revision. The commissioner shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game in the adoption and revision of the management plan.

Subject to valid existing rights, the commissioner may not dispose of the surface estate in state land within the Goldstream Public Use Area.

Consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.140

(1) — (3), the commissioner shall allow uses within the Goldstream Public Use Area, including but not limited to horseback riding, hiking, mining, all terrain vehicle driving, bicycling, dog sledding, cross-country skiing, skijoring, snowmachining, camping, and other traditional public uses of fish and wildlife populations such as fishing, hunting, trapping, viewing, and photographing of moose, trumpeter swan and other waterfowl, otter, beaver, mink, muskrat, and fox.

The Goldstream Public Use Area is open to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

, and the commissioner may adopt regulations to achieve the purposes specified in AS

41.23.140

(1) — (2). Each valid existing right or permit remains valid and continues in full force and effect according to its terms. The commissioner shall permit the exploration, development, and extraction of subsurface resources in a manner that is compatible with the purposes specified in AS

41.23.140

(1) — (2).

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately-owned land within the boundaries described in AS

41.23.170

but may acquire privately-owned land located within the boundaries described in AS

41.23.170

by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Goldstream Public Use Area.

The commissioner may not manage the Goldstream Public Use Area as a unit of the state park system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1990)

Revisor's notes. —

Section 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, provided that this section and
AS

41.23.150

,

41.23.160

, and

41.23.170

would be repealed effective July 1, 2010.
Under § 1,
ch. 25, SLA 2010, § 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, was itself repealed, but the effective date of the repeal of § 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, was August 25, 2010.
The legal effect of
ch. 25, SLA 2010, is uncertain.
See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Sec. 41.23.160.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict uses determined to be incompatible with the purposes of the Goldstream Public Use Area under AS

41.23.140

(1) — (2) within the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.23.170

.

Consistent with AS

41.23.140

—

41.23.170

, the Department of Fish and Game may engage in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and wildlife habitat within the area described in AS

41.23.170

.

The commissioner may not restrict fishing, hunting, or trapping rights allowed under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Goldstream Public Use Area.

The commissioner shall allow access to the Goldstream Public Use Area by motorized or nonmotorized means of transportation to private land, interests in private land, and for hunting, fishing, trapping, mining, and recreational purposes in a manner that is compatible with purposes specified in AS

41.23.140

(1) — (2). Existing trails remain open to public use.

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Fish and Game may have necessary access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Goldstream Public Use Area, the commissioner shall state in the management plan adopted or revised under AS

41.23.150

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for each determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1990)

Revisor's notes. —

Section 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, provided that this section and
AS

41.23.150

,

41.23.160

, and

41.23.170

would be repealed effective July 1, 2010.
Under § 1,
ch. 25, SLA 2010, § 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, was itself repealed, but the effective date of the repeal of § 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, was August 25, 2010.
The legal effect of
ch. 25, SLA 2010, is uncertain.
See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Sec. 41.23.170.
Goldstream Public Use Area.

Subject to valid existing rights, the vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within the boundaries described in this section are designated as the Goldstream Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for control and management:

Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 2 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Section 2: Lots 7 — 8 west of the centerline of Goldstream Road, Lot 11

Lots 9 — 10

Section 3:
Lots 5 — 13

Section 4:
Lots 9 — 11

Section 5:
SW1/4SW1/4

Section 7: Lot 4, S1/2NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4, S1/2SE1/4

Section 8:
E1/2, NE1/4NW1/4, S1/2NW1/4, SW1/4

Section 9:
Lots 1 — 2, E1/2NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, W1/2NW1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, SW1/4, W1/2NE1/4SE1/4, NW1/4SE1/4

Section 10:
NW1/4NW1/4

Section 11:
Lots 1 — 5

Section 12: Lots 2 — 3

Section 17:
NW1/4NW1/4

Section 18: N1/2NE1/4, SW1/4NE1/4, W1/2SE1/4NE1/4, NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, SE1/4;

Section 13: SE1/4, E1/2E1/2E1/2SW1/4

Section 23:
NE1/4SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4, W1/2SE1/4SE1/4, SE1/4SE1/4SE1/4, W1/2NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4

Section 24:
E1/2

Section 26: W1/2W1/2NW1/4NW1/4

Section 27: N1/2NE1/4NE1/4, SE1/4NE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SW1/4NE1/4NE1/4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 48 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 9 SLA 1994)

Revisor's notes. —

Section 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, provided that this section and
AS

41.23.150

,

41.23.160

, and

41.23.170

would be repealed effective July 1, 2010.
Under § 1,
ch. 25, SLA 2010, § 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, was itself repealed, but the effective date of the repeal of § 2,
ch. 48, SLA 1990, was August 25, 2010.
The legal effect of
ch. 25, SLA 2010, is uncertain.
See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Sec. 41.23.180.
Purpose of AS 41.23.180 — 41.23.230.

The purpose of AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

is to establish the area described in AS

41.23.230

as the Knik River Public Use Area. The Knik River Public Use Area is established to

perpetuate and enhance

general public recreation;

public enjoyment of fish and wildlife;

protect and maintain migratory waterfowl nesting areas; habitats for moose, Dall sheep, and brown bear; and other fish and wildlife habitat so that traditional public use of fish and wildlife populations may continue;

provide an area for the public to enjoy the full spectrum of public uses, including maintenance and enhancement of off-road motorized vehicle and nonmotorized recreational opportunities;

allow

continued motorized access for miners and owners of private property in the Knik River Public Use Area; and

additional public uses of the area determined by the commissioner to be compatible with this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2006)

Sec. 41.23.190.
Management.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the land and mineral estate within the Knik River Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.180

. After adequate public hearings, the commissioner may designate incompatible uses and shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Knik River Public Use Area. The management plan must include provisions for the enforcement of the plan and compliance with the requirements of the plan.

The commissioner of fish and game, the Board of Fisheries, and the Board of Game are responsible for the management of fish and game resources and public use of fish and wildlife in the Knik River Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.180

.

The Knik River Public Use Area may not be managed as a unit of the state park system.

The commissioner shall identify wetland areas within the Knik River Public Use Area and provide for the protection and use of the wetland areas in the management plan.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2006)

Sec. 41.23.200.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict uses determined to be incompatible with the purposes of the Knik River Public Use Area under AS

41.23.180

within the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.23.230

.

Nothing in AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and wildlife habitat within an area described in AS

41.23.230

that is consistent with the purposes stated in AS

41.23.180

.

The commissioner may not restrict

lawful fishing, hunting, or trapping rights allowed under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game in the Knik River Public Use Area; or

the use of weapons, including firearms, in the Knik River Public Use Area except in locations where the commissioner determines that the use of weapons constitutes a threat to public safety.

The commissioner shall

allow the Knik River Public Use Area to be used for activities that are compatible with the reasons for establishing the public use area in AS

41.23.180

and include all-terrain vehicles, aircraft, watercraft, airboats, snowmobiling, horseback riding, hiking, bicycling, dog sledding, cross-country skiing, skijoring, camping, hunting, fishing, wildlife viewing, photography, and, where permitted, mineral exploration and mining; and

recognize the existing off-road motor vehicle trails and the access those trails provide to areas in the Knik River Public Use Area, make accommodations that will provide the shortest possible route to avoid critical habitat, conduct trail rehabilitation in a way that minimizes damage, maintain and enhance off-road motor vehicle options and opportunities in the Knik River Public Use Area, and provide for increased use of the public use area.

The commissioner of public safety and the commissioner of fish and game shall have necessary access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2006)